Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-3729
Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist of revenue submitted by vendors as designated under section 81-3728. The balance of any account established after July 1, 2017, to receive revenue from the sale of advertising shall be transferred to the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash Fund. The commission shall use the fund to carry out its purposes under the Nebraska Visitors Development Act. Any money in the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2018, LB945, § 25.
April 5, 2018
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.